Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2205
Construction against implied repeal.

This code is a general act intended as a unified coverage of its subject matter and no part of it shall be deemed impliedly repealed by subsequent legislation if it can reasonably be avoided.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 5, UPC § 1-105.